North Dakota, session 69, HB1224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-23-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
30.1-23-01. (3-1201) Collection of personal property by affidavit.
1. Thirty days after the death of a decedent, any person indebted to the decedent or having
possession of tangible personal property or an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock,
or chose in action belonging to the decedent shall make payment of the indebtedness or
deliver the tangible personal property or an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, or
chose in action to a person claiming to be the successor of the decedent upon being
presented an affidavit made by or on behalf of the successor stating that:
a. The value of the entire estate subject to distribution or succession under chapters
30.1-01 through 30.1-23, wherever located, less liens and encumbrances, does not
exceed fiftyone hundred thousand dollars.
b. Thirty days have elapsed since the death of the decedent.
c. An application or petition for the appointment of a personal representative is not pending
or has not been granted in any jurisdiction.
d. The claiming successor is entitled to payment or delivery of the property.
2. A transfer agent of any security shall change the registered ownership on the books of a
corporation or limited liability company from the decedent to the successor upon the
presentation of an affidavit as provided in subsection 1.

H. B. NO. 1224 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1224.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State